Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-8,113
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Teacher Recruitment and Retention Act:

(1) Department means the State Department of Education;

(2) Dual enrollment means a course taught to students for credit at both a high school and a postsecondary institution;

(3) Grant means a grant for teacher recruitment and retention payments under the Nebraska Teacher Recruitment and Retention Act; and

(4) Teacher means a person who holds a valid certificate to teach in Nebraska issued by the Commissioner of Education and is employed in Nebraska for the instruction of students in elementary or high school grades.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 45;

Laws 2026, LB937, § 10.
July 18, 2026January 1, 2028